North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116D. Higher Education Bonds.
Article 3. Special Obligation Bonds for Improvements to the Facilities of The University of North Carolina.
§ 116D-28.
Fixing and collecting obligated resources.

Board to Provide Sufficient Resources. — For the purpose of aiding in the financing of a special obligation bond project and to provide security to the owners of the special obligation bonds issued to finance the special obligation bond project, the Board of Governors is authorized, to the extent the generation of the obligated resources is in the control of the Board, to fix, revise from time to time, charge, and collect the rents, charges, fees, or other revenues constituting the obligated resources. Fees and other revenue sources constituting obligated resources may be imposed or increased only with the approval of the Board of Governors. As long as any special obligation bonds issued under this Article and payable from those obligated resources are outstanding, the obligated resources, to the extent within the control of the Board of Governors, shall be so fixed and adjusted, with relation to other funds available, as to provide funds pursuant to the requirements of the resolution or trust agreement authorizing or securing the special obligation bonds and at least sufficient to pay the principal of and the interest on the special obligation bonds as they become due and payable, to assure the continued collection of the obligated resources, and to create and maintain reserves for these purposes. A sufficient amount of the obligated resources, except any part that may be necessary to pay the cost of maintenance, repair, and operation, and to provide reserves for these purposes and for renewals, replacements, extensions, enlargements, and improvements as may be provided for in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds or in the trust agreement securing the same, shall be set aside at regular intervals as may be provided in the resolution or trust agreement authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds in a sinking fund which is hereby pledged to, and charged with, the payment of the principal of and the interest on the special obligation bonds as they become due and the redemption price or the purchase price of special obligation bonds retired by call or purchase as provided in the resolution or trust agreement. This pledge shall be valid and binding from the time it is made, the obligated resources so pledged and thereafter received by the Board of Governors shall immediately be subject to the lien of the pledge without any physical delivery of the pledge or further act, and the lien of the pledge shall be valid and binding as against all parties having claims of any kind in tort, contract, or otherwise against the Board of Governors, irrespective of whether the parties have notice of the pledge. Neither the resolution nor any trust agreement by which a pledge is created need be filed or recorded except in the records of the Board of Governors. The use and disposition of moneys to the credit of the sinking fund shall be subject to the provisions of the resolution authorizing the issuance of the special obligation bonds or of the trust agreement securing the bonds.

State Pledge. — The State pledges to, and agrees with, the holders of any special obligation bonds or notes issued by the Board of Governors pursuant to this Article that as long as any of the special obligation bonds or notes are outstanding and unpaid, the State will not limit or alter the rights vested in the Board of Governors at the time of issuance of the special obligation bonds or notes to set the terms and conditions of the special obligation bonds or notes and to fulfill the terms of any agreements made with the bondholders or noteholders. The State shall in no way impair the rights and remedies of the bondholders or noteholders until the special obligation bonds or notes and all costs and expenses in connection with any action or proceedings by or on behalf of the bondholders or noteholders are fully paid, met, and discharged.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-29.
Vesting powers in committee.

The Board of Governors may authorize its budget and finance committee to sell any special obligation bonds which the Board has, with the approval of the Director of the Budget, authorized to be issued under this Article in any manner and under any limitations or conditions as the Board prescribes and to perform other functions under this Article the Board determines.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-30.
Refunding bonds.

The Board of Governors may, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, issue from time to time refunding bonds for the purpose of refunding any bonds by the Board under this Article or under any Article of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds refunded. The Board of Governors is further authorized, subject to the approval of the Director of the Budget, to issue from time to time refunding bonds for the combined purpose of (i) refunding any bonds issued by the Board under this Article or under any Article of Chapter 116 of the General Statutes, including the payment of any redemption premium on them and any interest accrued or to accrue to the date of redemption of the bonds, and (ii) paying all or any part of the cost of acquiring or constructing any additional special obligation bond projects.

This Article, as applicable, governs the issuance of refunding bonds, their maturities and other details, the rights and remedies of their holders, and the rights, powers, privileges, duties, and obligations of the Board of Governors with respect to them.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§ 116D-31.
Additional and alternative method.

This Article provides an additional and alternative method for the doing of the things authorized and is supplemental and additional to powers conferred by other laws, including

G.S. 116-175

to

G.S. 116-185

, inclusive and

G.S. 116-197

and

G.S. 116-198

, and is not in derogation of or repealing any powers now existing under any other law, whether general, special, or local. The issuance of special obligation bonds or refunding bonds under this Article, however, need not comply with the requirements of any other law applicable to the issuance of bonds.

History.

2000-3, s. 1.2.

§§ 116D-32 through 116D-40.

Reserved for future codification purposes.